Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0802.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 7401. (1) Except as authorized by this article, a person shall not manufacture, create, deliver, or possess with intent to manufacture, create, or deliver a controlled substance, a prescription form, or a counterfeit prescription form. A practitioner licensed by the administrator under this article shall not dispense, prescribe, or administer a controlled substance for other than legitimate and professionally recognized therapeutic or scientific purposes or outside the scope of practice of the practitioner, licensee, or applicant. (2) A person who violates this section as to: (a) A controlled substance classified in schedule 1 or 2 that is a narcotic drug or a drug described in section 7214(a)(iv) and: (i) Which That is in an amount of 1,000 grams or more of any mixture containing that substance is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years or a fine of not more than $1,000,000.00, or both. (ii) Which That is in an amount of 450 grams or more, but less than 1,000 grams, of any mixture containing that substance is guilty of a felony and punishable by imprisonment for not more than 30 years or a fine of not more than $500,000.00, or both. (iii) Which That is in an amount of 50 grams or more, but less than 450 grams, of any mixture containing that substance is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 20 years or a fine of not more than $250,000.00, or both. (iv) Which That is in an amount less than 50 grams, of any mixture containing that substance is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 20 years or a fine of not more than $25,000.00, or both. (b) Either of the following: (i) A substance described in section 7212(1)(h) or 7214(c)(ii) is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 20 years or a fine of not more than $25,000.00, or both. (ii) Any other controlled substance classified in schedule 1, 2, or 3, except marihuana or a substance listed in section 7212(1)(d), is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 7 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (c) A substance classified in schedule 4 is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (d) Marihuana, a mixture containing marihuana, or a substance listed in section 7212(1)(d) is guilty of a felony punishable as follows: (i) If the amount is 45 kilograms or more, or 200 marihuana plants or more, by imprisonment for not more than 15 years or a fine of not more than $10,000,000.00, or both. (ii) If the amount is 5 kilograms or more but less than 45 kilograms, or 20 marihuana plants or more but fewer than 200 marihuana plants, by imprisonment for not more than 7 years or a fine of not more than $500,000.00, or both. (iii) If the amount is less than 5 kilograms or fewer than 20 marihuana plants, by imprisonment for not more than 4 years or a fine of not more than $20,000.00, or both. (e) A substance classified in schedule 5 is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 2 years or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (f) A prescription form or a counterfeit prescription form is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 7 years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. (3) A term of imprisonment imposed under subsection (2)(a) may be imposed to run consecutively with any term of imprisonment imposed for the commission of another felony. (4) If an individual was sentenced to lifetime probation under subsection (2)(a)(iv) as it existed before March 1, 2003 and the individual has served 5 or more years of that probationary period, the probation officer for that individual may recommend to the court that the court discharge the individual from probation. If an individual's probation officer does not recommend discharge as provided in this subsection, with notice to the prosecutor, the individual may petition the court seeking resentencing under the court rules. The court may discharge an individual from probation as provided in this subsection. An individual may file more than 1 motion seeking resentencing under this subsection. (5) An individual is not in violation of this section related to a qualified psychoactive substance if the individual manufactures, creates, delivers, or possesses with intent to manufacture, create, or deliver the qualified psychoactive substance without receiving money or other valuable consideration for the qualified psychoactive substance. (6) (5) As used in this section: , "plant" (a) "Entheogenic plant or fungus" means a plant or fungus of any species in which there is naturally occurring any of the following substances listed in section 7212(1)(c), including any mixture or preparation thereof, or any other natural material containing an indole amine, tryptamine, or phenethylamine compound: (i) Dimethyltryptamine. (ii) Ibogaine. (iii) Mescaline. (iv) Psilocybin. (v) Psilocyn. (b) "Marihuana plant" means a marihuana plant that has produced cotyledons or a cutting of a marihuana plant that has produced cotyledons. (c) "Money or other valuable consideration" does not include a reasonable fee for counseling, spiritual guidance, or a related service that is provided in conjunction with the use of an entheogenic plant or fungus under the guidance and supervision of an individual providing the service. (d) "Qualified psychoactive substance" means any of the following: (i) An entheogenic plant or fungus. (ii) A material, compound, mixture, or preparation of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine listed under section 7212(1)(h). (iii) A material, compound, mixture, or preparation of lysergic acid diethylamide. Sec. 7403. (1) A person shall not knowingly or intentionally possess a controlled substance, a controlled substance analogue, or a prescription form unless the controlled substance, controlled substance analogue, or prescription form was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the course of the practitioner's professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by this article. (2) A person who violates this section as to: (a) A controlled substance classified in schedule 1 or 2 that is a narcotic drug or a drug described in section 7214(a)(iv), and: (i) That is in an amount of 1,000 grams or more of any mixture containing that substance is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for life or any term of years or a fine of not more than $1,000,000.00, or both. (ii) That is in an amount of 450 grams or more, but less than 1,000 grams, of any mixture containing that substance is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 30 years or a fine of not more than $500,000.00, or both. (iii) That is in an amount of 50 grams or more, but less than 450 grams, of any mixture containing that substance is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 20 years or a fine of not more than $250,000.00, or both. (iv) That is in an amount of 25 grams or more, but less than 50 grams of any mixture containing that substance is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years or a fine of not more than $25,000.00, or both. (v) That is in an amount less than 25 grams of any mixture containing that substance is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years or a fine of not more than $25,000.00, or both. (b) Either of the following: (i) A substance described in section 7212(1)(h) or 7214(c)(ii) is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 10 years or a fine of not more than $15,000.00, or both. (ii) A controlled substance classified in schedule 1, 2, 3, or 4, except a controlled substance for which a penalty is prescribed in subparagraph (i) or subdivision (a), (c), or (d), or a controlled substance analogue is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 2 years or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (c) Lysergic acid diethylamide, peyote, Peyote, mescaline, dimethyltryptamine, psilocyn, psilocybin, or a controlled substance classified in schedule 5 is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (d) Marihuana or a substance listed in section 7212(1)(d) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (e) A prescription form is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (3) The following individuals are not in violation of this section: (a) An individual who seeks medical assistance for himself or herself the individual or who requires medical assistance and is presented for assistance by another individual if he or she the individual is incapacitated because of a drug overdose or other perceived medical emergency arising from the use of a controlled substance or a controlled substance analogue that he or she the individual possesses or possessed in an amount sufficient only for personal use and the evidence of his or her the individual's violation of this section is obtained as a result of the individual's seeking or being presented for medical assistance. (b) An individual who in good faith attempts to procure medical assistance for another individual or who accompanies another individual who requires medical assistance for a drug overdose or other perceived medical emergency arising from the use of a controlled substance or a controlled substance analogue that he or she the individual possesses or possessed in an amount sufficient only for personal use and the evidence of his or her the individual's violation of this section is obtained as a result of the individual's attempting to procure medical assistance for another individual or as a result of the individual's accompanying another individual who requires medical assistance to a health facility or agency. (c) An individual who possesses a qualified psychoactive substance is not in violation of this section for possessing the qualified psychoactive substance. (4) A health facility or agency shall develop a process for notification of the parent or parents, guardian, or custodian of a minor under the age of 18 who is not emancipated under 1968 PA 293, MCL 722.1 to 722.6, and who voluntarily presents himself or herself, the minor's self, or is presented by another individual if he or she the minor is incapacitated, to a health facility or agency for emergency medical treatment as provided in subsection (3). (3)(a) and (b). A health facility or agency shall not provide notification to a parent or parents, guardian, or custodian under this subsection for nonemergency treatment without obtaining the minor's consent. (5) The exemption from prosecution under this section provided in subsection (3) does not prevent the investigation, arrest, charging, or prosecution of an individual for any other violation of the laws of this state or be grounds for suppression of evidence in the prosecution of any other criminal charges. (6) If an individual was sentenced to lifetime probation under subsection (2)(a)(iv) as it existed before March 1, 2003 and the individual has served 5 or more years of that probationary period, the probation officer for that individual may recommend to the court that the court discharge the individual from probation. If an individual's probation officer does not recommend discharge as provided in this subsection, with notice to the prosecutor, the individual may petition the court seeking resentencing under the court rules. The court may discharge an individual from probation as provided in this subsection. An individual may file more than 1 motion seeking resentencing under this subsection. (7) As used in this section: (a) "Drug overdose" means a condition including, but not limited to, extreme physical illness, decreased level of consciousness, respiratory depression, coma, mania, or death, that is the result of consumption or use of a controlled substance or a controlled substance analogue or a substance with which the controlled substance or controlled substance analogue was combined, or that a layperson would reasonably believe to be a drug overdose that requires medical assistance. (b) "Entheogenic plant or fungus" means a plant or fungus of any species in which there is naturally occurring any of the following substances listed in section 7212(1)(c), including any mixture or preparation thereof, or any other natural material containing an indole amine, tryptamine, or phenethylamine compound: (i) Dimethyltryptamine. (ii) Ibogaine. (iii) Mescaline. (iv) Psilocybin. (v) Psilocyn. (c) "Qualified psychoactive substance" means any of the following: (i) An entheogenic plant or fungus. (ii) A material, compound, mixture, or preparation of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine listed under section 7212(1)(h). (iii) A material, compound, mixture, or preparation of lysergic acid diethylamide. (d) (b) "Seeks medical assistance" means reporting a drug overdose or other medical emergency to law enforcement, the 9-1-1 system, a poison control center, or a medical provider, or assisting someone in reporting a drug overdose or other medical emergency. Sec. 7404. (1) A person shall not use a controlled substance or controlled substance analogue unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the course of the practitioner's professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by this article. (2) A person who violates this section as to: (a) A controlled substance classified in schedule 1 or 2 as a narcotic drug or a drug described in section 7212(1)(h) or 7214(a)(iv) or (c)(ii) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (b) A controlled substance classified in schedule 1, 2, 3, or 4, except a controlled substance for which a penalty is prescribed in subdivision (a), (c), or (d), or a controlled substance analogue, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (c) Lysergic acid diethylamide, peyote, Peyote, mescaline, dimethyltryptamine, psilocyn, psilocybin, or a controlled substance classified in schedule 5 is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 6 months or a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. (d) Marihuana, catha edulis, salvia divinorum, Catha edulis, Salva divinorum, or a substance described in section 7212(1)(d) or (i) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not more than $100.00, or both. (3) The following individuals are not in violation of this section: (a) An individual who seeks medical assistance for himself or herself the individual or who requires medical assistance and is presented for assistance by another individual if he or she the individual is incapacitated because of a drug overdose or other perceived medical emergency arising from the use of a controlled substance or a controlled substance analogue that he or she the individual possesses or possessed in an amount sufficient only for personal use and the evidence of his or her the individual's violation of this section is obtained as a result of the individual's seeking or being presented for medical assistance. (b) An individual who in good faith attempts to procure medical assistance for another individual or who accompanies another individual who requires medical assistance for a drug overdose or other perceived medical emergency arising from the use of a controlled substance or a controlled substance analogue that he or she the individual possesses or possessed in an amount sufficient only for personal use and the evidence of his or her the individual's violation of this section is obtained as a result of the individual's attempting to procure medical assistance for another individual or as a result of the individual's accompanying another individual who requires medical assistance to a health facility or agency. (c) An individual who uses a qualified psychoactive substance is not in violation of this section for using the qualified psychoactive substance. (4) A health facility or agency shall develop a process for notification of the parent or parents, guardian, or custodian of a minor under the age of 18 who is not emancipated under 1968 PA 293, MCL 722.1 to 722.6, and who voluntarily presents himself or herself, the minor's self, or is presented by another individual if he or she the minor is incapacitated, to a health facility or agency for emergency medical treatment as provided in subsection (3). (3)(a) and (b). A health facility or agency shall not provide notification to a parent or parents, guardian, or custodian under this subsection for nonemergency treatment without obtaining the minor's consent. (5) The exemption from prosecution under this section provided in subsection (3) does not prevent the investigation, arrest, charging, or prosecution of an individual for any other violation of the laws of this state, or be grounds for suppression of evidence in the prosecution of any other criminal charges. (6) As used in this section: (a) "Drug overdose" means a condition including, but not limited to, extreme physical illness, decreased level of consciousness, respiratory depression, coma, mania, or death, that is the result of consumption or use of a controlled substance or a controlled substance analogue or a substance with which the controlled substance or controlled substance analogue was combined, or that a layperson would reasonably believe to be a drug overdose that requires medical assistance. (b) "Entheogenic plant or fungus" means a plant or fungus of any species in which there is naturally occurring any of the following substances listed in section 7212(1)(c), including any mixture or preparation thereof, or any other natural material containing an indole amine, tryptamine, or phenethylamine compound: (i) Dimethyltryptamine. (ii) Ibogaine. (iii) Mescaline. (iv) Psilocybin. (v) Psilocyn. (c) "Qualified psychoactive substance" means any of the following: (i) An entheogenic plant or fungus. (ii) A material, compound, mixture, or preparation of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine listed under section 7212(1)(h). (iii) A material, compound, mixture, or preparation of lysergic acid diethylamide. (d) (b) "Seeks medical assistance" means reporting a drug overdose or other medical emergency to law enforcement, the 9-1-1 system, a poison control center, or a medical provider, or assisting someone in reporting a drug overdose or other medical emergency.